Tennessee, session 114, HB0814.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1307, is amended by deleting
subsection (g) and substituting:
(g)
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (g)(2), it is an exception to the
application of subsection (a) that a person is carrying, whether openly or
concealed, a handgun and:
(A)
(i) The person is at least twenty-one (21) years of age; or
(ii) The person is at least eighteen (18) years of age and:
(a) Is an honorably discharged or retired veteran of
the United States armed forces;
(b) Is an honorably discharged member of the
army national guard, the army reserve, the navy reserve,
the marine corps reserve, the air national guard, the air
force reserve, or the coast guard reserve, who has
successfully completed a basic training program; or
(c) Is a member of the United States armed forces
on active duty status or is a current member of the army
national guard, the army reserve, the navy reserve, the
HB0814
000072
- 1 -

marine corps reserve, the air national guard, the air force
reserve, or the coast guard reserve, who has successfully
completed a basic training program;
(B) The person lawfully possesses the handgun; and
(C) The person is in a place where the person is lawfully present.
(2) A county legislative body may elect not to permit persons within the
county to lawfully carry a handgun pursuant to the exception set out in
subdivision (g)(1) by passage of a resolution. Upon passage, the resolution has
the effect of eliminating the exception set out in subdivision (g)(1) to the criminal
offense of unlawful carrying, as prohibited by subsection (a), within the
boundaries of the county. If the county legislative body passes such a resolution,
then the county must provide notice to persons present within the county by
posting notice of the resolution in conspicuous public locations throughout the
county. Failure to adequately comply with the notice requirement imposed by
this subdivision (g)(2) does not affect the application of the exception.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1314(b), is amended by
adding the following new subdivision:
(5) The unlawful carrying of a firearm, as provided in § 39-17-1307(g)(2).
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000072